Illinois, session 104th, SB4154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $670,619,400, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 8Illinois to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal year 9ending June 30, 2027. 10    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 12Education Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of the 13University of Illinois for Labor and Employment Relations:14  For degree programs.................................804,40015  For certificate programs..........................1,500,00016    Total                                          $2,304,400 17    Section 15. The sum of $15,373,200, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 20costs and expenses related to or in support of the Prairie 21Research Institute, in accordance with Public Act 95-0728.   SB4154- 2 -OMB104 00299 HLR 10299 b1    Section 20. The sum of $40,380,600, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 4operating costs and expenses related to or in support of the 5University of Illinois Hospital. 6    Section 25. The sum of $750,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 8Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 9costs associated with the Hispanic Center of Excellence at the 10Chicago campus. 11    Section 30. The sum of $283,500, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 13Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 14Dixon Springs Agricultural Center. 15    Section 35. The sum of $971,100, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 17Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 18costs associated with the Public Policy Institute at the 19Chicago campus. 20    Section 40. The sum of $302,200, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance   SB4154- 3 -OMB104 00299 HLR 10299 b1Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 2a grant to the College of Dentistry. 3    Section 45. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for costs 6associated with the Illinois Heart Rescue. 7    Section 46. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund for a grant to the Board of Trustees of the University of 10Illinois for a grant to the University of Illinois at 11Springfield for the Illinois Innocence Project, and any 12associated administrative expenses. 13    Section 50. The sum of $8,040,800, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention 15Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 16the purpose of maintaining the Illinois Fire Service 17Institute, paying the Institute's expenses, and providing the 18facilities and structures incident thereto, including payment 19to the University for personal services and related costs 20incurred. 21    Section 55. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated from the State College and   SB4154- 4 -OMB104 00299 HLR 10299 b1University Trust Fund to the Board of Trustees of the 2University of Illinois for scholarship grant awards. 3    Section 60. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Pet Population Control 5Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 6costs associated with pet population control at the College of 7Veterinary Medicine. 8    Section 65. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the Emergency Public Health 10Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 11costs and expenses related to or in support of Emergency 12Mosquito Abatement. 13    Section 70. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Used Tire Management 15Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 16costs and expenses related to or in support of mosquito 17research and abatement. 18    Section 75. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, is appropriated from the Hazardous Waste 20Research Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 21Illinois for its ordinary and contingent expenses related to 22the Prairie Research Institute.   SB4154- 5 -OMB104 00299 HLR 10299 b1    Section 80. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Professions 3Dedicated Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 4Illinois for costs associated with the development, support or 5administration of pharmacy practice education or training 6programs for the College of Medicine at Rockford. 7    Section 85. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Board of trustees of the University of Illinois for 10the University's Climate Jobs Institute. 11    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.